Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-505.01
Nebraska National
Guard; tuition assistance program; limitations; conditions.

(1)
The tuition assistance program prescribed in sections 85-505 to 85-508 shall
not be available to:

(a) More than one thousand two hundred members during any fiscal year;

(b) Any
member who has a baccalaureate degree; and

(c) Any member who has not exhausted federal tuition assistance
benefits available to him or her.

(2) The tuition assistance
program prescribed in sections 85-505 to 85-508 shall be available to members
of the Nebraska National Guard for a period of ten years, as provided in section
85-505, from the date of initial membership.

(3) Any member of the Nebraska National Guard receiving tuition assistance
under sections 85-505 to 85-508 may obtain only one baccalaureate degree
under such tuition assistance program. Only credit-bearing courses which meet
degree requirements shall be approved for tuition assistance. Members shall
not receive tuition assistance for any noncredit courses.

(4) If a member of the Nebraska National Guard voluntarily withdraws
from a course for which he or she is receiving tuition assistance, the member
shall be liable for all costs relating to such withdrawal, including, but
not limited to, all of the costs billed by the educational institution to
the Nebraska National Guard. Reimbursement shall be in accordance with section
72-1601.

(5) Any member of the Nebraska National Guard who receives tuition assistance
shall agree in writing to serve in the Nebraska National Guard for three years
after the completion of the courses for which tuition assistance was given.
Any member who receives tuition assistance may be asked to reimburse the State
of Nebraska if any such member leaves the Nebraska National Guard during such
three-year period. Reimbursement shall be in accordance with section 72-1601.

(6) The Military Department shall retain the responsibility and authority
to establish any limitations and controls it deems necessary to ensure maximum
fiscal efficiency and productivity of the tuition assistance program prescribed
in sections 85-505 to 85-508.

Laws 1986, LB 931, § 2;

Laws 1987, LB 436, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 866, § 2;

Laws 1989, LB 13, § 4;

Laws 2001, LB 286, § 1;

Laws 2008, LB746, § 2;

Laws 2014, LB766, § 2.